Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.900

Expiration of RCW 43.131.010 through 43.131.150—Exception.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1372.SL) ***

RCW 43.131.010 through 43.131.150 expire June 30, 2025, unless extended by law for an additional fixed period of time.

[ 2013 c 44 s 2; 2000 c 189 s 12; 1988 c 17 s 2; 1982 c 223 s 16; 1979 c 22 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 16.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2013 c 44: "The legislature finds that the sunset review process allows the legislature to evaluate the need for the continued existence of agencies and programs, to assess the effectiveness and performance of these agencies and programs, and to ensure public accountability. It is the intent of the legislature to continue using this important accountability tool." [ 2013 c 44 s 1.]